Missouri, session 2026, SB1738.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 115, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 115.638, to read as
follows:
115.638. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering
with an election official if, with the purpose to harass or
intimidate an election official in the performance of such
official's official duties, such person:
(1) Threatens or causes harm to such election official
or members of such election official's family;
(2) Uses force, threats, or deception against or
toward such election official or members of such election
official's family;
(3) Attempts to induce, influence, or pressure an
election official or members of an election official's
family to violate this chapter;
(4) Engages in conduct reasonably calculated to harass
or alarm such election official or such election official's
family, including stalking pursuant to section 565.225 or
565.227; or

SB 1738 2
(5) Disseminates through any means, including by
posting on the internet, the personal information of an
election official or any member of an election official's
family. For purposes of this section, "personal
information" includes a home address, home telephone number,
mobile telephone number, personal email address, Social
Security number, federal tax identification number, checking
and savings account numbers, credit card numbers, marital
status, or identity of a child under eighteen years of age.
2. For the purposes of this section, the term
"election official" includes the election authority,
election judges, and other volunteers or employees of an
election authority.
3. The offense of tampering with an election official
is a class one election offense. If a violation of this
section results in death or bodily injury to an election
official or a member of the official's family, the offense
shall be a class B felony.
✓